Massachusetts, session 194th, S2011.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by 
section 103 of chapter 268 of the acts of 2022, is hereby further amended by adding the 
following subsection:-  
(dd) A person or taxpayer who employs persons engaged in “agricultural and farm work,” 
as defined in section 2 of chapter 151, except when the employee is a parent, spouse, child or 
other member of the employer's immediate family, shall be allowed a refundable credit against 
the tax liability imposed by this chapter as follows: the amount of the refundable credit shall 
equal up to 40% of the hourly wages paid for agricultural and farm work that exceeds the 
employee’s regular hourly rate as overtime wages pursuant to section 1A of said chapter 151. For 
taxpayers who employ persons engaged in “agricultural and farm work,” as defined in section 2 
of chapter 151, the percentage of the refundable credit shall be determined by the number of 
employees engaged in “agricultural and farm work”, as defined in section 2 of chapter 151, 
employed by the taxpayer, and scaled according to size, such that farms with fewer employees 

of 5 14 engaged in “agricultural and farm work” will receive a tax credit worth a larger percent of their 
overtime wages paid than farms with a larger number of employees engaged in “agricultural and 
farm work” will receive. The tax credit shall not exceed 40%. If the amount of the credit allowed 
under this section exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the commissioner of revenue shall treat such 
excess as an overpayment and shall pay the taxpayer 100 per cent of the amount of such excess, 
without interest.   
SECTION 2.  Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:-  
Section 82. A person or taxpayer who employs persons engaged in “agricultural and farm 
work,” as defined in section 2 of chapter 151, except when the employee is a parent, spouse, 
child or other member of the employer's immediate family, shall be allowed a refundable credit 
against the tax liability imposed by this chapter as follows: the amount of the refundable credit 
shall equal up to 40% of the hourly wages paid for agricultural and farm work that exceeds the 
employee’s regular hourly rate as overtime wages pursuant to section 1A of said chapter 151. For 
taxpayers who employ persons engaged in “agricultural and farm work,” as defined in section 2 
of chapter 151, the percentage of the refundable credit shall be determined by the number of 
employees engaged in “agricultural and farm work”, as defined in section 2 of chapter 151, 
employed by the taxpayer, and scaled according to size, such that farms with fewer employees 
engaged in “agricultural and farm work” will receive a tax credit worth a larger percent of their 
overtime wages paid than farms with a larger number of employees engaged in “agricultural and 
farm work” will receive. The tax credit shall not exceed 40%. If the amount of the credit allowed 
under this section exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the commissioner of revenue shall treat such 

of 5 36 excess as an overpayment and shall pay the taxpayer 100 per cent of the amount of such excess, 
without interest.   
SECTION 3. Section 1A of chapter 151 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting at the end of the first sentence, after the word “employed” the following words:-  
; this includes employees engaged in “agricultural and farm work”, as defined in section 
2 of chapter 151, who are engaged in solely or primarily secondary “agricultural and farm work”. 
For those employees engaged in “agricultural and farm work”, as defined in section 2 of chapter 
151, who for a work week longer than 55 hours are engaged in solely primary or both primary 
and secondary “agricultural and farm work”, such employees shall  receive compensation for 
their employment in excess of 55 hours at a rate not less than one-and-one-half times the regular 
rate at which they are employed.   
SECTION 4. Said section 1A of said chapter 151 is hereby further amended by striking 
out clause 19.   
SECTION 5. Section 2 of said chapter 151 is hereby amended by striking out, in the 
definition of “Occupation”, after the words “professional service”, the words “agricultural and 
farm work,”.   
SECTION 6. Said section 2 of said chapter 151 is hereby further amended by striking 
out, in the definition of “Agricultural and farm work,” after the words “labor on a farm,” the 
words “and the growing and harvesting of agricultural, floricultural and horticultural 
commodities” and inserting the following words:-   

of 5 56  wherein an agricultural employee is employed by a farmer and that same employee is 
engaged in solely primary agriculture, solely secondary agriculture, or both primary and 
secondary agriculture. Primary agriculture shall include farming in all its branches, including the 
cultivation and tillage of the soil, the production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of 
agricultural, aquacultural, floricultural and horticultural commodities, dairying, the growing and 
harvesting of forest products upon forest land, the raising and keeping of livestock, bees, fur-
bearing animals, and raising and keeping of poultry, swine, cattle and other domesticated animals 
used for food purposes. Secondary agriculture shall include preparing commodities for market – 
including cleaning, sorting, peeling, washing, packing, and delivering commodities to storage, to 
market, or to a carrier for transporting to market. An employee who never engages in either 
primary or secondary agriculture on a farm is not performing “agricultural and farm work” even 
when they engage in practices incidental to or in conjunction with farming operations on a farm 
and shall not be considered an agricultural employee.   
SECTION 7. Said section 2 of said chapter 151 is hereby further amended by inserting, 
after the definition of “Agricultural and farm work,” the following definitions:-   
“Farm”, the site of agricultural business where both primary and secondary agriculture is 
integral to the said agricultural business and are performed on a regular basis by agricultural 
employees.   
SECTION 8. Not later than six months after the effective date of this act, the department 
of revenue shall promulgate regulations to implement Sections 1 and 2. With respect to Sections 
1 and 2, the department of revenue shall issue regulations after input from stakeholders to 
implement the tax credit including determining size of the credit farm employers shall receive. 

of 5 78 Specifically, the department shall determine the percentage of overtime premium paid that shall 
be offset by a tax credit, scaling the percentage according to farm size wherein farms with the 
fewest number of agricultural employees engaged in “agricultural and farm work” receive the 
largest tax credit amounting to no more than 40%, and farms with a greater number of 
agricultural employees engaged in “agricultural and farm work" receive a progressively smaller 
tax credit.   
SECTION 9. Not later than six months after the effective date of this act, the department 
of labor standards shall promulgate regulations to implement Section 3. With respect to Section 
3, the department of labor standards shall issue regulations after input from stakeholders 
clarifying the percent of primary and/or secondary agriculture an agricultural employee must be 
engaged in during the work week for the employee to receive overtime after 55 hours instead of 
after 40 hours.   
SECTION 10. Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall become effective on January 1 of the 
calendar year following the effective date of this act. Sections 4 through 10 shall become 
effective immediately upon passage of the act.